Oklahoma, session 2025, SB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 5-107, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-107. A. There is hereby created the “Oklahoma Meat
Consumer Protection Act”.
B. As used in the Oklahoma Meat Consumer Protection Act:
1. “Cell-cultured meat”, also referred to as lab-grown meat,
cultivated meat, clean meat, in vitro meat, imitation meat,
synthetic meat, and fake meat, means a food product developed from
animal cell cultures rather than through the traditional raising and
slaughtering of livestock. Cell-cultured meat does not include
imitation meat made of non-meat ingredients including, but not
limited to, plant-based protein;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB96 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. “Insect-protein food product” means a food product having
one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue
originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of
being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing
insect parts;
3. “Livestock” means animals defined by paragraph 9 of Section
1-3 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. 4. “Meat” means any edible portion of livestock or part
thereof;
3. 5. “Misrepresent” means the use of any untrue, misleading,
or deceptive oral or written statement, advertisement, label,
display, picture, illustration, or sample; and
4. 6. “Represent” means the use of any form of oral or written
statement, advertisement, label, display, picture, illustration, or
sample.
C. Pursuant to the Oklahoma Meat Consumer Protection Act, no
person advertising, offering for sale, or selling meat shall engage
in any misleading or deceptive practices, including, but not limited
to, the following:
1. Misrepresenting the cut, grade, brand, trade name, or weight
or measure of any meat, or misrepresenting a product as meat that is
not derived from harvested production livestock; provided, product
packaging for plant-based items shall not be considered in violation
of the provisions of this paragraph so long as the packaging
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB96 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

disp lays that the product is derived from plant-based sources in
type that is uniform in size and prominence to the name of the
product;
2. Using a USDA-quality grade on a product not graded by the
United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) or Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry (ODAFF); or
3. Failing to fully and conspicuously disclose the correct
government grade for any product if the product is represented as
having been graded by the USDA or ODAFF; or
4. Failing to fully and conspicuously disclose that a product
is cell-cultured meat or is an insect-protein food product.
D. The State Board of Agriculture shall promulgate rules
necessary to enforce compliance with the Oklahoma Meat Consumer
Protection Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
February 24, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB96 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)